dix/consistent-monA.dix
    <pardef n="ser__vb">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>as</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>is</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>os</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>us</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>us</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="fts"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ita</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itaj</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itan</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itajn</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>onta</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontaj</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inta</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp3"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inta</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>intaj</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ante</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ante</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="gerpast"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>u</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="i__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>as</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>is</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>os</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>us</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>us</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>ita</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ita</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itaj</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itan</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itajn</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>onta</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontaj</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inta</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp3"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inta</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>intaj</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ante</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ante</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="gerpast"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>u</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>ita</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>itaj</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Barcelono__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>n</l> 
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Barcelon/o__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>o</l> 
        <r>o<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>on</l> 
        <r>o<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Barcelona__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="United_States__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Marko__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>n</l> 
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Mark/o__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>o</l> 
        <r>o<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>on</l> 
        <r>o<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>o</l> 
        <r>o<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Maria__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>n</l> 
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Mark__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Mary__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="CX__num">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nomi"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="one__num">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

    <e lm="Budho">
        <i>Budh</i> 
        <par n="Mark/o__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Davido">
        <i>David</i> 
        <par n="Mark/o__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Helena">
        <i>Helena</i> 
        <par n="Maria__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Eliza">
        <i>Eliza</i> 
        <par n="Maria__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Ilza">
        <i>Ilza</i> 
        <par n="Maria__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Eŭgeno">
        <i>Eŭgen</i> 
        <par n="Mark/o__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Agnesa">
        <i>Agnesa</i> 
        <par n="Maria__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Izabela">
        <i>Izabela</i> 
        <par n="Maria__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Jakobo">
        <i>Jakob</i> 
        <par n="Mark/o__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Joakimo">
        <i>Joakim</i> 
        <par n="Mark/o__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Julia">
        <i>Julia</i> 
        <par n="Maria__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Juliano">
        <i>Julian</i> 
        <par n="Mark/o__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Eleonora">
        <i>Eleonora</i> 
        <par n="Maria__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Marta">
        <i>Marta</i> 
        <par n="Maria__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Marteno">
        <i>Marten</i> 
        <par n="Mark/o__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Petro">
        <i>Petr</i> 
        <par n="Mark/o__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Barcelona">
        <i>Barcelona</i> 
        <par n="Barcelona__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Urugvajo">
        <i>Urugvajo</i> 
        <par n="Barcelona__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Eŭropa Unio">
        <i>Eŭropa<b/>Uni</i> 
        <par n="Barcelon/o__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Hungario">
        <i>Hungari</i> 
        <par n="Barcelon/o__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Aŭstrio">
        <i>Aŭstri</i> 
        <par n="Barcelon/o__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Malajzio">
        <i>Malajzio</i> 
        <par n="Barcelona__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Moskvo">
        <i>Moskv</i> 
        <par n="Barcelon/o__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Ateno">
        <i>Aten</i> 
        <par n="Barcelon/o__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Monako">
        <i>Monak</i> 
        <par n="Barcelon/o__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Acoroj">
        <i>Acoroj</i> 
        <par n="Barcelono__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Balearoj">
        <i>Balearoj</i> 
        <par n="Barcelono__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="EEK">
        <i>EEK</i> 
        <par n="Barcelono__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Ĉadio">
        <i>Ĉadi</i> 
        <par n="Barcelon/o__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Filipinoj">
        <i>Filipinoj</i> 
        <par n="Barcelono__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Irak">
        <i>Irak</i> 
        <par n="Barcelono__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Salomonoj">
        <i>Salomonoj</i> 
        <par n="Barcelono__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Nepalo">
        <i>Nepal</i> 
        <par n="Barcelon/o__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Pireneoj">
        <i>Pireneoj</i> 
        <par n="Barcelono__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="EU">
        <i>EU</i> 
        <par n="Barcelono__np" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="brodi">
        <i>brod</i> 
        <par n="i__vblex" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ekzisti">
        <i>ekzist</i> 
        <par n="ser__vb" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ellabori">
        <i>ellabor</i> 
        <par n="i__vblex" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="esti">
        <i>est</i> 
        <par n="ser__vb" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ĝeni">
        <i>ĝen</i> 
        <par n="i__vblex" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="konfuzi">
        <i>konfuz</i> 
        <par n="i__vblex" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="malproksimigi">
        <i>malproksimig</i> 
        <par n="i__vblex" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="pledi">
        <i>pled</i> 
        <par n="i__vblex" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="revivigi">
        <i>revivig</i> 
        <par n="i__vblex" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ŝiri">
        <i>ŝir</i> 
        <par n="i__vblex" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="I">
        <i>I</i> 
        <par n="CX__num" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="III">
        <i>III</i> 
        <par n="CX__num" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="IX">
        <i>IX</i> 
        <par n="CX__num" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="M">
        <i>M</i> 
        <par n="CX__num" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="VIII">
        <i>VIII</i> 
        <par n="CX__num" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="XIII">
        <i>XIII</i> 
        <par n="CX__num" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="XVI">
        <i>XVI</i> 
        <par n="CX__num" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="XXI">
        <i>XXI</i> 
        <par n="CX__num" /> 
    </e>
